Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.020

Notice of restraint—Owner known.

Whenever any animals are restrained as provided in RCW 16.04.010, the person restraining such animals shall within twenty-four hours thereafter notify in writing the owner, or person in whose custody the same was at the time the trespass was committed, of the seizure of such animals, and the probable amount of the damages sustained: PROVIDED, He or she knows to whom such animals belong.

[ 2011 c 336 s 418; 1893 c 31 s 2; RRS s 3091. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1925 ex.s. c 56 s 2; 1893 c 31 s 3; RRS s 3092, now codified as RCW 16.04.025.]